Hawaii, session 2026, SB2386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 378-2.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  This section shall [not] apply to job listings for[:] full-time, part-time, temporary, and seasonal employment; provided that this section shall not apply to job listings for: (1)  Positions that are internal transfers or promotions within a current employer; (2)  Public employee positions for which salary, benefits, or other compensation are determined pursuant to collective bargaining; or (3)  Positions with employers having fewer than [fifty] twenty-five employees." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________